California, session 20252026, AB1000.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.65 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.65. This division does not apply to a project to remove sediment from the Five-Mile Basin in the City of Chico. SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the significant flooding risk present until a sediment removal project is complete within the Five-Mile Basin is unique to the City of Chico and the area that immediately surrounds it.SECTION 1.Section 13001 of the Water Code is amended to read:13001.It is the intent of the Legislature that the state board and each regional board shall be the principal state agencies with primary responsibility for the coordination and control of water quality. The state board and regional boards shall, in exercising any power granted in this division, conform to and implement the policies of this chapter and shall, at all times, coordinate their respective activities in order to achieve a unified and effective water quality control program in the state.